Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 295.52, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Small rural ambulance services. new text end new text begin (a) Small rural ambulance services are not subject to the tax under this section. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "small rural ambulance service" means an ambulance service that: new text end new text begin (1) has a base of operations, as defined in section 144E.001, located outside the metropolitan counties listed in section 473.121, subdivision 4, and outside the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud; and new text end new text begin (2) has annual gross revenues equal to or less than $10,000,000. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval as provided in section 2, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained as provided in section 2. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin FEDERAL APPROVAL; WAIVERS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must request, as the commissioner determines necessary, federal approval of the exemption from the health care-related tax under Minnesota Statutes, section 295.52, subdivision 2, for small rural ambulance services, as provided in section 1. The request must include a stipulation that the approval be given without loss of eligibility for federal financial participation. new text end new text begin (b) To obtain the federal approval, the commissioner may apply for a waiver of the federal broad-based requirement for health care-related taxes, the uniform requirement for health care-related taxes, and any other provision of federal law necessary to be waived to implement the exemption from the health care-related tax under Minnesota Statutes, section 295.52, subdivision 2, of small rural ambulance services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end